DI-563

DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

DIATB-01

DTC

B0133/62 Short in P/T Squib RH Circuit (to B+)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The P/T squib RH circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly and the seat belt pretensioner RH.
It causes the SRS to deploy when the SRS deployment conditions are satisfied.

For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS-3.

DTC B0133/62 is recorded when a B+ short is detected in the P/T squib RH circuit.

« Airbag sensor assembly malfunction

e Floor No. 2wire
e Dashwire (Benchseat)

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
. . o « Seat belt pretensioner RH (P/T squib RH)
e Short in P/T squib RH circuit (to B+) .
. . * Airbag sensorassembly
B0133/62 ¢ P/T squib RH malfunction

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI-539.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection (See step 1 on page DI-764).

-

2 [ Check seat type.

CHECK:

Confirm that the type of the front seat.

OK:

A: Separate seat
B: Bench seat

L2

Go to step 6.
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DI-564
DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTALRESTRAINT SYSTEM

3 | Check floor No. 2 wire (P/T squib RH circuit).

ON PREPARATION:
@ Floor No. 2 Wire Connectthe negative ( -) terminal cable tothe battery, and wait
:| At at least for 2 seconds.
rbag CHECK:
. S —_—
P/T Squib RH I Assembly (a) Turnthe gnition switchto ON.
CD :l (b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and PR+
of the floor No. 2 wire connector on the seat belt preten-
% sioner RH (P/T squib RH) side.
O\ Ok:
PR+ Voltage: Below 1V
H01019 E]] . .
ABO119 = NG% pair orreplace floor No.2 wire.
H08394 H08268

@
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DI-565
SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

4 | Check airbag sensor assembly.

Floor No. 2 Wire

:l Airbag
; Sensor
P/T Squib RH :l Assembly

PR+ @ PR- oN

DTC B0133/62

CG TC

H01020
H02139 AB0119

H10600 HO1081 H10625
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PREPARATION:

(@ Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.

(b) Using a service wire, connect PR+ and PR- of the floor
No. 2 wire connector on the seat belt pretensioner RH
(P/T squib RH) side.

() Connect the negative (-) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).

(c) Turntheignition switchto LOCK, and waitatleastfor 10
seconds.

(d) Turntheignition switchto ON, and wait at least for 10se-
conds.

(e) Check the DTC (See page DI-432).

K:

DTCBO 133/62is notoutput.

HINT:

CodesotherthancodeB0 133/62may be outputatthistime, but

they are not relevant to this check.

e )

Replace airbag sensor assembly.




DI-566

DIAGNOSTICS -

SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

5 | Check P/T squib RH.

]Airbag
P/T Squib RH Sensor
T Squi [I:l :lAssemny
: ON
DLC3 DTC B0133/62
ETIII &
EA Il .
o
CG TC

HO1021
ABO119

H10600 H01081 H10626

@

PREPARATION:

(@  Turn ignition switch to LOCK.

(b) Disconnect the negative (-) terminal cable from the bat-
tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.

(c) Connect the seat belt pretensioner RH (P/T squib RH)
connector.

(d) Connect the negative (-) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).

(c) Turntheignition switchto LOCK, and waitatleastfor 10
seconds.

(d) Turntheignition switchto ON, and wait at least for 10se-
conds.

(e) Checkthe DTC (See page DI-432).

K:

DTCBO0 133/62is notoutput.

HINT:

Codesotherthancode B0 133/62 may be output atthistime, but

they are not relevant to this check.

NG>

Replace seat belt pretensioner RH
(P/T squib RH).

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

6 [ Check P/T squib RH circuit.

P/T Squib RH

] ]

N

ON

%

H21542
AB0119
H08394

:l Airbag
Sensor
:| Assembly

PR+

H21700

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

PREPARATION:

Connect the negative (=) terminal cable to the battery, and wait

at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@) Turn the ignition switch to ON.

(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and PR+
of the seat belt pretensioner RH (P/T squib RH) side be-
tween the airbag sensor assembly and the seat belt pre-
tensioner RH (P/T squib RH).

Voltage: Below 1V

NG> Go to step 9.
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DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

7 | Check airbag sensor assembly.

P/T Squib RH

:| Airbag

CG TC

H21543
H02139 AB0119
H10600 H01081

Sensor
|

Assembly,

ON

DTC B0133/62

PREPARATION:

(@)  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.

(b) Disconnect the negative (=) terminal cable from the bat-
tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.

(c) Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.

(d) Using a service wire, connect PR+ and PR- of the con-
nector on the seat belt pretensioner RH (P/T squib RH)
side between the seat belt pretensioner RH (P/T squib
RH) and the airbag sensor assembly.

(e) Connect the negative (=) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:
(@) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).

(c) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10
seconds.

(d)  Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

H21701 conds.
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(e) Checkthe DTC (See page DI-432).
OK:
DTC B0133/62 is not output.
HINT:
Codes other than code B0133/62 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG> Replace airbag sensor assembly.
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DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM
8 |[Check P/T squib RH.
PREPARATION:
(@)  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
:| Airbag (b) Disconnect the negative (=) terminal cable from the bat-
P/T Squib RH Sensor tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
< T T | Assembly (c) Connect the seat belt pretensioner RH (P/T squib RH)
e connector.
(d) Connect the negative (=) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.
ON CHECK:
@ (@) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).
DLC3 DTC B0133/62 (c) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10
. ; seconds.
q? = (d)  Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
ERVA NN
== conds.
te 1 (e) Checkthe DTC (See page DI-432).
OK:
E%éié% HOL081 H21702 DTC B0133/62 is not output.
HINT:

Codes other than code B0133/62 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG> Replace seat belt pretensioner RH

(P/T squib RH).

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM
9 [Check floor No. 2 wire.
Floor No. 2 Wire PREPARATIO'.\I: . .
Dash Wire :| (&)  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
Airbag (b) Disconnect the negative () terminal cable from the bat-
P/T SquibRH | — :| Sensor tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
CD :| Assembly (c) Disconnect the floor No. 2 wire from the dash wire.
% (d) Connect the negative (=) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.
ON CHECK:
@ &) '(T?J' (@) Turn the ignition switch to ON.

(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and PR+
of the floor No. 2 wire connector on the seat belt preten-
sioner RH (P/T squib RH) side.

= OK:

H21541
ABO119
H08394

H21703

OK

Voltage: Below 1V

NG> Repair or replace floor No. 2 wire.

Repair or replace dash wire.
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